Missouri, session 2026, HB2280.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 60.510 and 60.610, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 60.510 and 60.610, to read as follows:
60.510. The functions, duties and responsibilities of the department of agriculture
shall be as follows:
(1) To restore, maintain, and preserve the land survey monuments, section corners,
and quarter section corners established by the United States public land survey within
Missouri, together with all pertinent field notes, plats and documents; and also to restore,
establish, maintain, and preserve Missouri state and county boundary markers and other
boundary markers considered by the department of agriculture to be of importance, or
otherwise established by law;
(2) To design and cause to be placed at established public land survey corner sites,
where practical, substantial monuments permanently indicating, with words and figures, the
exact location involved, but if such monuments cannot be placed at the exact corner point,
then witness corners of similar design shall be placed as nearby as possible, with words and
figures indicating the bearing and distance to the true corner;
(3) To establish, maintain, and provide safe storage facilities for a comprehensive
system of recordation of information respecting all monuments established by the United
States public land survey within this state, and such records as may be pertinent to the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2280 2
department of agriculture's establishment or maintenance of other land corners, Missouri state
plane coordinate system stations and accessories, and survey monuments in general;
(4) Beginning August 28, 2026, but not later than December 31, 2046, to restore
and monument the centerline geometry of all railroad rights of way within the state of
Missouri that have been abandoned by the United States Surface Transportation Board
(STB) or previously by the United States Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC);
(5) To provide the framework for all geodetic positioning activities in the state. The
foundational elements include latitude, longitude, and elevation which contribute to informed
decision making and impact on a wide range of important activities including mapping and
geographic information systems, flood risk determination, transportation, land use and
ecosystem management and use of the Missouri state plane coordinate system, as established
by sections 60.401 to 60.496;
[(5)] (6) To collect and preserve information obtained from surveys made by those
authorized to establish land monuments or land boundaries, and to assist in the proper
recording of the same by the duly constituted county officials, or otherwise;
[(6)] (7) To furnish, upon reasonable request and tender of the required fees therefor,
certified copies of records created or maintained by the department of agriculture which,
when certified by the state land surveyor or a designated assistant, shall be admissible in
evidence in any court in this state, as the original record; and
[(7)] (8) To prescribe, and disseminate to those engaged in the business of land
surveying, regulations designed to assist in uniform and professional surveying methods and
standards in this state.
60.610. 1. Whenever the department of agriculture deems it expedient, and when
funds appropriated permit, the department of agriculture may enter into any contract with
agencies of the United States, with agencies of other states, or with private persons, registered
land surveyors or professional engineers, in order to plan and execute desired land surveys or
geodetic surveys, or to plan and execute other projects which are within the scope and
purpose of sections 60.510 to 60.620 and section 60.670.
2. In order to plan, execute and complete new projects under subdivision (4) of
section 60.510, no later than December 31, 2046, the department of agriculture is
authorized to enter into contracts, as deemed necessary, with registered land surveyors
or professional engineers.
✔